Hawaii statutes.
§103D-108 Compliance audit unit; duties and
responsibilities. The compliance audit unit shall:

(1) Review and assess applicable innovations in
procurement methods or processes in other governmental jurisdictions or as
described in national or regional publications;

(2) Review current or proposed statutes and rules to
determine whether they promote fairness, efficiency, and accountability in the
procurement process;

(3) Review selected contracts awarded pursuant to
section 103D-304;

(4) Conduct studies, research, and analyses, and make
reports and recommendations with respect to existing and new methods of
procurement and other matters within the jurisdiction of the policy board;

(5) Establish and maintain a procurement library;

(6) Report to the appropriate agency and the chief
procurement officer stating the areas of noncompliance and recommendations for
remedial action; and

(7) Be present at legislative hearings and policy
board meetings to present the findings of the unit. [L Sp 1993, c 8, pt of §2;
am L 1998, c 11, §5]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next